Massachusetts, session 194th, H659.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1 of Chapter 69 of the General laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by striking out item (4) and inserting in place thereof the following words,
effective July 1, 2023:
“(4) an effective mechanism in the form of a computer-adaptive assessment with a high
enough ceiling and low enough floor to monitor the actual progress of individual students’
mastery through the various K-12 learning standards in English, Mathematics, Science and
Social Studies; which mechanism seeks to identify, on an annual basis, the learning standards
students likely have already mastered and those which they haven’t, for the purposes of
identifying all students’ authentic growth, ensuring their continuous progress through those
learning standards, identifying directly the actual level of each student’s learning readiness in the
public classrooms of the Commonwealth, and of holding educators more accurately and fairly
accountable through such authentic measure of students’ achievement and growth.”
of 3

Section 1B of Chapter 69 of the General Laws as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition
is hereby amended by inserting the following paragraphs after the first paragraph:
For the purposes of this section the term “school age child” shall mean every child
between the minimum age established by regulations created pursuant to chapter 76 section 1
and through age 21, who has not attained a high school diploma or its equivalent, and those who
are age 19 or below on July 1 of any year, if they have attained a high school diploma.
The board of elementary and secondary education shall establish regulations, to become
effective no later than July 1, 2023, to establish an education system that will engage each school
age child in learning at a level commensurate with their prior demonstrated achievement, and at a
pace which is suitable for each, within the K-12 education program in all public schools in the
Commonwealth.
The board of elementary and secondary education, by July 1, 2025, shall develop or
procure and distribute to districts, formative and computer-adaptive interim assessments to
measure each of the K-12 learning standards; and shall expand the state-wide student-level
information data system to include individual student data from those assessments, along with
the data from the annual summative accountability assessment.
The board of elementary and secondary education shall ensure that all assessment data
collected on children is analyzed to determine, for each, the appropriate level of instruction in
each of the content areas, and that the Department will deliver the results to schools.
Section 1I of Chapter 69 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by replacing the fourth sentence of the second paragraph with the following
sentence, effective July 1, 2023:
of 3

“Such instruments shall be criterion-referenced and flexible enough to assess which
levels of the various academic standards described in this chapter students are meeting.”
Section 5 of Chapter 76 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by inserting at the end thereof, the following sentence:
“No person admitted to any public school shall be discriminated against in obtaining the
advantages, privileges and courses of study of such public school on account of age.”
of 3